California statutes. Family Code
(3) If two or more persons are subject to court-ordered genetic testing, the court may order that the testing be completed concurrently or sequentially.

(4) Genetic testing of a woman who gave birth to a child is not a condition precedent to the testing of the child and a person whose genetic parentage of the child is being determined. If the woman is unavailable for genetic testing, the court may order genetic testing of the child and each person whose genetic parentage of the child is at issue.

(5) An order under this division for genetic testing is enforceable by
 contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 851, Sec. 3.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7551.5.

All hospitals, local child support agencies, welfare offices, and family courts shall facilitate genetic tests for purposes of enforcement of this chapter. This may include having a health care professional available for purposes of extracting samples to be used for genetic testing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 652, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7552.

(a) Genetic testing shall be of a type reasonably relied on by experts in the field of genetic testing and performed in a testing laboratory accredited by either of the following:

(1) The AABB, formerly known as the American Association of Blood Banks, or a successor organization.

(2) An accrediting body designated by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(b) A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of a sample or a combination of samples of blood, buccal cells, bone, hair, or other body tissue or fluid. The
 specimen used in the testing need not be of the same kind for each person undergoing genetic testing.

(c) Based on the ethnic or racial group of a person undergoing genetic testing, a testing laboratory shall determine the databases from which to select frequencies for use in calculating a relationship index. If a person or a local child support agency objects to the laboratory’s choice, the following rules shall apply:

(1) Not later than 30 days after receipt of the report of the test, the objecting person or local child support agency may request the court to require the laboratory to recalculate the relationship index using an ethnic or racial group different from that used by the laboratory.

(2) The person or local
 child support agency objecting to the choice of laboratories under this subdivision shall do either of the following:

(A) If the requested frequencies are not available to the laboratory for the ethnic or racial group requested, provide the requested frequencies compiled in a manner recognized by accrediting bodies.

(B) Engage another laboratory to perform the calculations.

(3) The laboratory may use its own statistical estimate if there is a question of which ethnic or racial group is appropriate. The laboratory shall calculate the frequencies using statistics, if available, for any other ethnic or racial group requested.

(d) If, after recalculation of the
 relationship index pursuant to subdivision (c) using a different ethnic or racial group, genetic testing does not identify a person as a genetic parent of the child, the court may require a person who has been tested to submit to additional genetic testing to identify a genetic parent.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 14.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7552.5.

(a) A copy of the results of all genetic testing performed under Section 7551 or 7558 shall be served upon all parties, by any method of service authorized under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure except personal service, no later than 20 days prior to a hearing in which the genetic test results may be admitted into evidence. The genetic test results shall be accompanied by a declaration under penalty of perjury of the custodian of records or other qualified employee of the
 laboratory that conducted the genetic tests, stating in substance each of the following:

(1) The declarant is the duly authorized custodian of the records or other qualified employee of the laboratory, and has authority to certify the records.

(2) A statement that establishes in detail the chain of custody of all genetic samples collected, including the date on which the genetic sample was collected, the identity of each person from whom a genetic sample was collected, the identity of the person who performed or witnessed the collecting of the genetic samples and packaged them for transmission to the laboratory, the date on which the genetic samples were received by the laboratory, the identity of the person who unpacked the samples and forwarded them to the person who performed
 the laboratory analysis of the genetic sample, and the identification and qualifications of all persons who performed the laboratory analysis and published the results.

(3) A statement that establishes that the procedures used by the laboratory to conduct the tests for which the test results are attached are used in the laboratory’s ordinary course of business to ensure accuracy and proper identification of genetic samples.

(4) The genetic test results were prepared at or near the time of completion of the genetic tests by personnel of the business qualified to perform genetic tests in the ordinary course of business.

(b) The genetic test results shall be admitted into evidence at the hearing or trial to establish
 parentage, without the need for foundation testimony of authenticity and accuracy, unless a written objection to the genetic test results is filed with the court and served on all other parties, by a party no later than five days prior to the hearing or trial in which parentage is at issue.

(c) If a written objection is filed with the court and served on all parties within the time specified in subdivision (b), experts appointed by the court shall be called by the court as witnesses to testify to their findings and are subject to cross-examination by the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 15.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7553.

(a) The compensation of each expert witness appointed by the court shall be fixed at a reasonable amount. It shall be paid as the court shall order. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the court may order that it be paid by the parties in the proportions and at the times the court prescribes, or that the proportion of any party be paid by the county, and that, after payment by the parties or the county or
 both, all or part or none of it be taxed as costs in the action or proceeding.

(b) If the expert witness is appointed for the court’s needs, the compensation shall be paid by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 470, Sec. 22.   (AB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7554.

(a) If the woman who gave birth to the child is the only other person who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child under this division, the court shall find the person who is the alleged father or genetic parent who is not a donor under Section 7613 to be a parent of the child if the person meets any of the following:

(1) Is identified pursuant to Section 7555 as a genetic parent of the child and the identification is not successfully challenged.

(2) Admits parentage in a pleading, when making an appearance, or during a hearing, the court accepts the admission, and the court determines that the person is a
 genetic parent of the child.

(3) Declines to submit to genetic testing ordered by the court or a local child support agency, in which case, the court may find that the person is a parent of the child even if the person denies a genetic relationship with the child.

(4) Is in default after service of process and the court determines the person to be a genetic parent of the child.

(5) Is neither identified nor excluded as a genetic parent by genetic testing and, based on other evidence, the court determines the person to be a genetic parent of the child.

(b) If more than one person other than the woman who gave birth asserts a claim under this division to be the child’s
 parent, parentage shall be determined under provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 81.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7555.

(a) Subject to a challenge under subdivision (b), a person is identified under this part as a genetic parent of a child if genetic testing complies with this part and the results of the testing disclose both of the following:

(1) The person has at least a 99 percent probability of parentage, using a prior probability of 0.50, as calculated by using the combined relationship index obtained in the testing.

(2) A combined relationship index of at least 100 to 1.

(b) A person identified pursuant to subdivision (a) as a genetic parent of the child may
 challenge the genetic testing results only by other genetic testing satisfying the requirements of this chapter that either excludes the person as a genetic parent of the child or identifies another person as a possible genetic parent of the child other than the woman who gave birth to the child or the person challenging parentage.

(c) If more than one person, other than the woman who gave birth to the child, is identified by genetic testing as a possible genetic parent of the child, the court shall order each person to submit to further genetic testing to identify a genetic parent.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 19.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7556.

This part applies to criminal actions subject to the following limitations and provisions:

(a) An order for genetic testing shall be made only upon application of a party or on the court’s initiative.

(b) The compensation of the experts, other than an expert witness appointed by the court for the court’s needs, shall be paid by the county under order of court. The compensation of an expert witness appointed for the court’s needs shall be paid by the court.

(c) The court may direct a verdict of acquittal if the person is found not to be a genetic parent pursuant to Section 7555, otherwise the
 case shall be submitted for determination upon all the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 20.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7557.

Nothing in this part prevents a party to an action or proceeding from producing other expert evidence on the matter covered by this part; but, where other expert witnesses are called by a party to the action or proceeding, their fees shall be paid by the party calling them and only ordinary witness fees shall be taxed as costs in the action or proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7558.

(a) This section applies only to cases where support enforcement services are being provided by the local child support agency pursuant to Section 17400.

(b) In any civil action or proceeding in which parentage is a relevant fact, and in which the issue of parentage is contested, the local child support agency may issue an administrative order requiring the mother, child, and the alleged father to submit to genetic testing if any of the following conditions exist:

(1) The person alleging parentage has signed a statement under penalty of perjury that sets forth facts that establish a reasonable possibility
 that the person is the child’s genetic parent.

(2) The person denying parentage has signed a statement under penalty of perjury that sets forth facts that establish a reasonable possibility that the person is not a genetic parent of the child.

(3) The alleged father has filed an answer in the action or proceeding in which parentage is a relevant fact and has requested that genetic tests be performed.

(4) The woman who gave birth to the child and the alleged father agree in writing to submit to genetic tests.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the local child support agency may not order a person to submit to genetic tests in any of the following instances:

(1) The person has been found to have good cause for failure to cooperate in the determination of parentage pursuant to Section 11477 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A case in which more than one person other than the woman who gave birth asserts a claim under this division to be the child’s parent.

(3) A case involving a child conceived through assisted reproduction.

(d) The local child support agency shall pay the costs of any genetic tests that are ordered under subdivision (b), subject to the county obtaining a court order for reimbursement from the alleged father if parentage is established pursuant to Section 7553.

(e) This section does not prohibit a person who has been ordered by the local child support agency to submit to genetic tests pursuant to this section from filing a notice of motion with the court in the action
 or proceeding in which parentage is a relevant fact seeking relief from the local child support agency’s order to submit to genetic tests. In that event, the court shall resolve the issue of whether genetic tests should be ordered as provided in Section 7551. When a person refuses to submit to the tests after receipt of the administrative order pursuant to this section and fails to seek relief from the court from the administrative order either prior to the scheduled tests or within 10 days after the tests are scheduled, the court may resolve the question of parentage against that person or enforce the administrative order if the rights of others or the interest of justice so require. Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person’s refusal to submit to tests ordered by the local child support agency is admissible in evidence in any proceeding to determine parentage if a notice of motion is not
 filed within the timeframes specified in this subdivision.

(f) If the original test result is contested, the local child support agency shall order an additional test only upon request and advance payment of the contestant.

(g) The local child support agency shall not order in utero genetic testing.

(h) The local child support agency shall administer this section consistent with federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 21.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7559.

Payment of the cost of initial genetic testing shall be made in advance when agreed to by the parties or ordered by the court pursuant to Section 7640.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 22.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7560.

The court or local child support agency shall order additional genetic testing upon the request of a person who contests the results of the initial testing under Section 7555.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 23.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7562.

If a person seeking genetic testing demonstrates good cause, the court may order genetic testing of a deceased person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 24.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Establishment of Parentage by Voluntary Declaration [7570. - 7581.]

7570.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(1) There is a compelling state interest in establishing parentage for all children. Establishing parentage is the first step toward a child support award, which, in turn, provides children with equal rights and access to benefits, including, but not
 limited to, social security, health insurance, survivors’ benefits, military benefits, and inheritance rights.

(2) A simple administrative system allowing for establishment of voluntary parentage will result in a significant increase in the ease of establishing parentage, a significant increase in parentage establishment, an increase in the number of children who have greater access to child support and other benefits, and a significant decrease in the time and money required to establish parentage due to the removal of the need for a lengthy and expensive court process to determine and
 establish parentage and is in the public interest.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 27.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7571.

(a) On and after January 1, 1995, upon the event of a live birth, prior to an unmarried mother or a mother who gave birth to a child conceived through assisted reproduction leaving a hospital, the person responsible for registering live births under Section 102405 of the Health and Safety Code shall provide to the woman giving birth and shall attempt to provide, at the place of birth, to the person identified by the woman giving birth as either the only possible genetic parent other than the woman who gave birth or the intended parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction, a voluntary declaration of parentage together with the written materials described in Section 7572. Staff in the hospital shall witness the signatures of parents signing a voluntary declaration of parentage and shall forward the signed declaration
 to the Department of Child Support Services within 20 days of the date the declaration was signed. A copy of the declaration shall be made available to each of the attesting parents.

(b) A health care provider shall not be subject to civil, criminal, or administrative liability for a negligent act or omission relative to the accuracy of the information provided or for filing the declaration with the appropriate state or local agencies.

(c) The local child support agency shall pay the sum of ten dollars ($10) to birthing hospitals and other entities that provide prenatal services for each completed declaration of parentage that is filed with the Department of Child Support Services, provided that the local child support agency and the hospital or other entity providing prenatal services has entered into a written agreement that specifies the terms and conditions for the payment as
 required by federal law.

(d) If the declaration is not registered by the person responsible for registering live births at the hospital, it may be completed by the attesting parents, notarized, and mailed to the Department of Child Support Services at any time after the child’s birth.

(e) Prenatal clinics shall offer prospective parents the opportunity to sign a voluntary declaration of parentage. In order to be paid for their services as provided in subdivision (c), prenatal clinics must ensure that the form is witnessed and forwarded to the Department of Child Support Services within 20 days of the date the declaration was signed.

(f) Declarations shall be made available without charge at all local child support agency offices, offices of local registrars of births and deaths, courts, and county welfare departments
 within this state. Staff in these offices shall witness the signatures of parents wishing to sign a voluntary declaration of parentage and shall be responsible for forwarding the signed declaration to the Department of Child Support Services within 20 days of the date the declaration was signed.

(g) The Department of Child Support Services, at its option, may pay the sum of ten dollars ($10) to local registrars of births and deaths, county welfare departments, or courts for each completed declaration of parentage that is witnessed by staff in these offices and filed with the Department of Child Support Services. In order to receive payment, the Department of Child Support Services and the entity shall enter into a written agreement that specifies the terms and conditions for payment as required by federal law. The Department of Child Support Services shall study the effect of the ten dollar ($10) payment on obtaining completed voluntary
 declaration of parentage forms.

(h) The Department of Child Support Services and local child support agencies shall publicize the availability of the declarations. The local child support agency shall make the declaration, together with the written materials described in subdivision (a) of Section 7572, available upon request to any parent and any agency or organization that is required to offer parents the opportunity to sign a voluntary declaration of parentage. The local child support agency shall also provide qualified staff to answer parents’ questions regarding the declaration and the process of establishing parentage.

(i) Copies of the declaration and any rescissions filed with the Department of Child Support Services shall be made available only to the parents, the child, the local child support agency, the county welfare department, the county counsel, the State
 Department of Public Health, and the courts.

(j) Publicly funded or licensed health clinics, pediatric offices, Head Start programs, child care centers, social services providers, prisons, and schools may offer parents the opportunity to sign a voluntary declaration of parentage. In order to be paid for their services as provided in subdivision (c), publicly funded or licensed health clinics, pediatric offices, Head Start programs, child care centers, social services providers, prisons, and schools shall ensure that the form is witnessed and forwarded to the Department of Child Support Services.

(k) An agency or organization required to offer parents the opportunity to sign a voluntary declaration of parentage shall also identify parents who are willing to sign but were unavailable when the child was born. The organization shall then contact these parents within 10 days and again
 offer the parent the opportunity to sign a voluntary declaration of parentage.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 59.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7572.

(a) The Department of Child Support Services, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Association of Hospitals and Health Systems, and other affected health provider organizations, shall work cooperatively to develop written materials to assist providers and parents in complying with this chapter. These written materials shall be updated periodically by the Department of Child Support Services to reflect changes in law, procedures, or public need.

(b) The written materials for unmarried parents or parents of a child conceived through assisted reproduction that shall be attached to the form specified in Section 7574 and shall contain the following information:

(1) A signed voluntary declaration of parentage that is filed with the Department of Child Support Services legally establishes parentage.

(2) The legal rights and obligations of both parents and the child that result from the establishment of parentage.

(3) An alleged father’s constitutional rights to have the issue of parentage decided by a court; to notice of any hearing on the issue of parentage; to have an opportunity to present the alleged father’s case to the court, including the right to present and cross-examine witnesses; to be represented by an attorney; and to have an attorney appointed if the alleged father cannot afford one in a parentage action filed by a local child support agency.

(4) That by signing the voluntary declaration of parentage, the father is voluntarily waiving the father’s
 constitutional rights.

(c) Parents shall also be given oral notice of the rights and responsibilities specified in subdivision (b). Oral notice may be accomplished through the use of audio- or video-recorded programs developed by the Department of Child Support Services to the extent permitted by federal law.

(d) The Department of Child Support Services shall, free of charge, make available to hospitals, clinics, and other places of birth all informational and training materials for the program under this chapter, as well as the declaration of parentage form. The Department of Child Support Services shall make training available to every participating hospital, clinic, local registrar of births and deaths, and other place of birth no later than June 30, 1999.

(e) The Department of Child Support Services may adopt
 regulations, including emergency regulations, necessary to implement this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 60.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7573.

(a) The following persons may sign a voluntary declaration of parentage to establish the parentage of the child:

(1) An unmarried woman who gave birth to the child and another person who is a genetic parent.

(2) A married or unmarried woman who gave birth to the child and another person who is a parent under Section 7613 of a child conceived through assisted reproduction.

(b) A voluntary declaration of parentage shall be in a record signed by the woman who gave birth to the child and by either the only possible genetic parent other than the woman who gave birth or the intended parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction, and the signatures shall be attested by a notary or witnessed.

(c) Except as provided by Section 7580, a voluntary declaration of parentage takes effect on the filing of the document with the Department of Child Support Services.

(d) Except as provided in Sections 7573.5,
 7575, 7576, 7577, and 7580, a completed voluntary declaration of parentage that complies with this chapter and that has been filed with the Department of Child Support Services is equivalent to a judgment of parentage of the child and confers on the declarant all rights and duties of a parent.

(e) The court shall give full faith and credit to a voluntary declaration of parentage effective in another state if the declaration was in a signed record and otherwise complies with the law of the other state.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 33.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7573.5.

(a) A voluntary declaration of parentage is void if, at the time of signing, any of the following are true:

(1) A person other than the woman who gave birth to the child or a person seeking to establish parentage through a voluntary declaration of parentage is a presumed parent under Section 7540 or subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 7611.

(2) A court has entered a judgment of parentage of the child.

(3) Another person has signed a valid voluntary declaration of parentage.

(4) The child has a parent
 under Section 7613 or 7962 other than the signatories.

(5) The person seeking to establish parentage is a donor pursuant to Section 7613.

(6) The person seeking to establish parentage asserts that the person is a parent under Section 7613 and the child was not conceived through assisted reproduction.

(b) In an action in which a party is seeking a determination that a voluntary declaration of parentage is void under this section, notice shall be provided pursuant to Section 7635.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 851, Sec. 4.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7574.

(a) The voluntary declaration of parentage shall be executed on a form developed by the Department of Child Support Services in consultation with the State Department of Public Health and groups addressing child support, child custody, assisted reproduction issues, and lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender rights.

(b) The form described in subdivision (a) shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The name and the signature of the woman who gave birth to the child.

(2) The name and the signature of the person seeking to establish parentage.

(3) The name of the child.

(4) The date of birth of the child.

(5) For a voluntary declaration of parentage signed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7573, all of the following:

(A) A statement by the woman who gave birth that the woman is unmarried and understands the written materials described in Section 7572, that the person who is signing the voluntary declaration of parentage is the only possible genetic parent other than the woman who gave birth, that the woman who gave birth consents to the establishment of parentage by the genetic parent signing the voluntary declaration of parentage, and that the woman who gave birth
 understands that a challenge by a signatory to a valid declaration of parentage is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred two years after the effective date of the declaration.

(B) A statement by the person signing the voluntary declaration of parentage that the person has read and understands the written materials described in Section 7572, understands that by signing the voluntary declaration of parentage the person is waiving rights as described in the written materials, that the person is the genetic parent of the child, that the person consents to the establishment of parentage by signing the voluntary declaration of parentage, that the person is assuming all the rights and responsibilities of a parent and wishes to be named on the child’s birth certificate, and that the person understands that a challenge by a
 signatory to a valid declaration of parentage is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred two years after the effective date of the declaration.

(6) For a voluntary declaration of parentage signed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7573, all of the following:

(A) A statement by the woman who gave birth that the woman has read and understands the written materials described in Section 7572, that the person who is signing the voluntary declaration of parentage is the intended parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction, that the woman who gave birth consents to the establishment of parentage by the other person signing the voluntary declaration of parentage, and that the woman who gave birth understands that a challenge by a
 signatory to a valid declaration of parentage is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred two years after the effective date of the declaration.

(B) A statement that the person seeking to establish parentage has read and understands the written materials described in Section 7572, understands that by signing the voluntary declaration of parentage the person is waiving rights as described in the written materials, that the person is the intended parent of the child conceived through assisted reproduction, that the person consents to the establishment of parentage by signing the voluntary declaration of parentage, that the person is assuming all the rights and responsibilities of a parent and wishes to be named on the child’s birth certificate, and that the person understands that a challenge by a signatory to a valid
 declaration of parentage is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred two years after the effective date of the declaration.

(7) The name and the signature of the person who witnesses the signing of the declaration.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 36) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 84.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7575.

(a) Either parent may rescind the voluntary declaration of parentage by filing a rescission form with the Department of Child Support Services within 60 days of the date of execution of the declaration by the attesting parents, whichever signature is later, unless a court order for custody, visitation, or child support has been entered in an action in which the signatory seeking to rescind was a party. The Department of Child Support Services shall develop a form to be used by parents to rescind the declaration of parentage and instructions on how to complete and file the rescission with the Department of Child Support Services. The form shall include a declaration under penalty of perjury completed by the person filing the rescission form that certifies that a copy of the rescission form was sent by any
 form of mail requiring a return receipt to the other person who signed the voluntary declaration of parentage. A copy of the return receipt shall be attached to the rescission form when filed with the Department of Child Support Services. The form and instructions shall be written in simple, easy to understand language and shall be made available at the local family support office and the office of local registrar of births and deaths. The department shall, upon written request, provide to a court or commissioner a copy of any rescission form filed with the department that is relevant to proceedings before the court or commissioner.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 38.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7576.

(a) After the period for rescission provided in Section 7575 expires, but not later than two years after the effective date provided in subdivision (c) of Section 7573 of a voluntary declaration of parentage, a signatory of the voluntary declaration of parentage may commence a proceeding to challenge the declaration on the basis of fraud, duress, or material mistake of fact.

(b) The limitations period provided in subdivision (a) shall not apply if the voluntary declaration of parentage is void under Section 7573.5.

(c) This section
 shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 40.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7577.

The following rules apply in an action to challenge a valid voluntary declaration of parentage brought by a person who is not a signatory to the declaration. This section does not apply to a voluntary declaration of parentage that is void under Section 7573.5.

(a) A person has standing under this section if the person is an alleged genetic parent who is not a donor under Section 7613, is a presumed parent under Section 7611, or any person who has standing under Section 7630.

(b) The petition challenging a voluntary declaration of parentage pursuant to this section shall be supported by a declaration under oath alleging specific facts to
 support standing under this section.

(c) If the court holds a hearing to determine standing, the hearing shall be held on an expedited basis. If the person challenging the voluntary declaration of parentage is an alleged genetic parent, genetic testing shall be ordered on an expedited basis.

(d) The action shall be filed not later than two years after the effective date of the declaration. This limitations period does not apply if the voluntary declaration of parentage is void under Section 7573.5.

(e) Notice shall be provided to the signatories of the declaration and to any person entitled to notice under Section 7635. A person who asserts a claim to parentage under this division shall be joined in the action.

(f) With respect to whether the voluntary declaration of parentage should be set aside, the person petitioning to set aside the voluntary declaration of parentage shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence.

(g) The court may grant the petition to set aside the voluntary declaration of parentage only if the court finds that setting aside the voluntary declaration of parentage is in the best interest of the child, based on consideration of all of the following factors:

(1) The age of the child.

(2) The length of time since the effective date of the voluntary declaration of parentage.

(3) The nature, duration, and quality of any relationship between the person who signed the voluntary declaration of parentage and the child, including the duration and frequency of any time periods during which the child and the person resided in the same household or enjoyed a parent and child relationship.

(4) The request of the person who signed the voluntary declaration of parentage that the parent and child relationship continue.

(5) If the person challenges a voluntary declaration of parentage signed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7573, the court shall additionally consider all of the following:

(A) Notice by the genetic parent of the child that the genetic parent does not
 oppose preservation of the relationship between the person who signed the declaration of parentage and the child.

(B) Whether any conduct of the person who signed the voluntary declaration has impaired the ability to ascertain the identity of, or obtain support from, the genetic parent.

(6) Additional factors deemed by the court to be relevant to its determination of the best interest of the child.

(h) If the voluntary declaration of parentage is challenged by a
 person who is presumed to be a parent under subdivision (d) of Section 7611, the court’s ruling on the petition to set aside the voluntary declaration of parentage shall, in addition to the factors under subdivision (g), also take into account the nature, duration, and quality of the relationship between the petitioning party and the child and the benefit or detriment to the child of continuing that relationship.

(i) If the court denies the petition to set aside the voluntary declaration of parentage, the court shall state on the record the basis for the denial of the action and any supporting facts.

(j) (1) If the court grants the petition to set aside the voluntary declaration of parentage, the court shall adjudicate parentage pursuant to
 Section 7612.

(2) An order for custody, visitation, or child support shall remain in effect until the court determines that the voluntary declaration of parentage should be set aside, subject to the court’s power to modify the orders as otherwise provided by law.

(k) This section does not prejudice or bar the rights of a person who is not a signatory and has standing under subdivision (a) to file an action or motion to set aside the voluntary declaration of parentage on any of the grounds described in, and within the time limits specified in, Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If the action or motion to set aside a judgment is required to be filed within a specified time period under Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the period within which the action or motion to set
 aside the voluntary declaration of parentage must be filed shall commence on the date that the court makes an initial order for custody, visitation, or child support based upon a voluntary declaration of parentage.

(l) This section does not restrict a court from acting as a court of equity.

(m) The Judicial Council shall develop the forms and procedures necessary to effectuate this section.
